Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.592

Dual language designation—Rate enhancement.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2022, the department shall establish a dual language designation and provide subsidy rate enhancements or site-specific grants for licensed or certified child care providers who are accepting state subsidy; early childhood education and assistance program contractors; or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program contractors. It is the intent of the legislature to allow uses of rate enhancements or site-specific grants to include increased wages for individual staff who provide bilingual instruction, professional development training, the purchase of dual language and culturally appropriate curricula and accompanying training programs, instructional materials, or other related expenses.

(2) The department must consult with a culturally and linguistically diverse stakeholder advisory group to develop criteria for the dual language designation.

(3) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2021 c 199 s 305.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.